Tennessee statutes. Title 3 Legislature
Part 3

Select Oversight Committee on Education [Repealed]

3-15-301. [Repealed.]

Acts 1984 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, § 13; T.C.A., §49-5-5021; Acts 1993, ch. 251, § 1; 1995, ch. 46, § 1; repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 410, § 1(a), effective July 1, 2011.Acts 1984 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, §§ 12, 13; 1984, ch. 829, § 6; T.C.A., §49-5-5021; 1986, ch. 933, §§ 3, 4; T.C.A., §49-5-5022; Acts 1993, ch. 251, § 1; 1995, ch. 46, § 1, repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 410, § 1(a), effective July 1, 2011.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§3-15-301 —3-15-302 concerned the select oversight committee on education.

3-15-302. [Repealed.]

Acts 1984 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, §§ 12, 13; 1984, ch. 829, § 6; 1986, ch. 933, §§ 3, 4; T.C.A., §49-5-5022; repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 410, § 1(a), effective July 1, 2011.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§3-15-301 —3-15-302 concerned the select oversight committee on education.